Indiana, session 2026, SB53.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-1-9-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 12.5. Except as provided in section 13 of
this chapter, the general assembly may not establish or modify
house or senate districts at a time other than the first regular
session of the general assembly convening immediately following
the United States decennial census.
SECTION 2. IC 3-3-2-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. (a) Congressional districts
shall be established by law at the first regular session of the general
assembly convening immediately following the United States decennial
census.
(b) Except as provided in section 2 of this chapter, the general
assembly may not establish or modify congressional districts at a
time other than the first regular session of the general assembly
convening immediately following the United States decennial
census.
2026 IN 53—LS 6198/DI 149


SECTION 3. IC 3-3-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.133-2021,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) This subsection applies only to the first
regular session of the one hundred twenty-second general assembly. If
the general assembly adjourns sine die before November 15, 2021,
without having complied with the requirements of section 1 of this
chapter, a redistricting commission is established. The redistricting
commission consists of the speaker of the house, the president pro tem
of the senate, the chairpersons of the senate and house committees
responsible for legislative apportionment, and a fifth member
appointed by the governor from the membership of the general
assembly.
(b) (a) This subsection applies to a session of the general assembly
beginning after November 15, 2021. If a session of the general
assembly adjourns without having complied with the requirements of
section 1 of this chapter or if for any other reason at any time the state
finds itself without a valid congressional district law, a redistricting
commission shall be established which shall consist of the speaker of
the house, the president pro tem of the senate, the chairman of the
senate and house committees responsible for legislative apportionment
and a fifth member who shall be appointed by the governor from the
membership of the general assembly.
(c) (b) The redistricting commission shall meet within thirty (30)
days after adjournment of the general assembly at a time and place
designated by the president pro tem of the senate and shall adopt a
congressional redistricting plan in accordance with this chapter.
(d) (c) Any plan so adopted shall be signed by a majority of the
redistricting committee and submitted to the governor who forthwith
shall issue and publish the governor's executive order establishing
congressional districts in accordance with the plan so adopted and
directing the commission to place such congressional districts in effect
for the primary and general elections next succeeding such general
assembly. Congressional districts so established shall continue in effect
until changed by statute.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 53—LS 6198/DI 149